it: Metodo di controllo dell'utente: Telecomando portatile; Pannello di controllo integrato; App per smartphone; Smartwatch; Controllo vocale; Altro
pt-PT: Método de controlo do utilizador: Comando à distância; Painel de controlo integrado; App para smartphone; Smartwatch; Controlo por voz; Outro
fi: Käyttäjän ohjausmenetelmä: Käsikaukosäädin; Sisäänrakennettu ohjauspaneeli; Älypuhelinsovellus; Älykello; Ääniohjaus; Muu
th: วิธีการควบคุมโดยผู้ใช้: รีโมทคอนโทรลแบบถือ; แผงควบคุมในตัว; แอปสมาร์ทโฟน; สมาร์ทวอทช์; การควบคุมด้วยเสียง; อื่นๆ
hr-HR: Metoda upravljanja korisnika: Ručni daljinski upravljač; Ugrađena upravljačka ploča; Aplikacija za pametni telefon; Pametni sat; Glasovno upravljanje; Ostalo
sk-SK: Spôsob ovládania používateľa: Ručné diaľkové ovládanie; Zabudovaný ovládací panel; Aplikácia pre smartfóny; Smart hodinky; Hlasové ovládanie; Iné
nl: Bedieningsmethode gebruiker: Handafstandsbediening; Geïntegreerd bedieningspaneel; Smartphone-app; Smartwatch; Spraakbediening; Overig
sl-SI: Metoda uporabniškega upravljanja: Ročni daljinski upravljalnik; Vgrajena nadzorna plošča; Aplikacija za pametni telefon; Pametna ura; Glasovno upravljanje; Drugo
pt-BR: Método de controle de usuários: Controle remoto portátil; Painel de controle a bordo; App para smartphone; Smartwatch; Controle por voz; Outro
pl: Metoda sterowania przez użytkownika: Pilot ręczny; Wbudowany panel sterowania; Aplikacja na smartfona; Smartwatch; Sterowanie głosem; Inne
ja: ユーザー制御方法: 携帯用リモコン; 車載コントロールパネル; スマートフォンアプリ; スマートウォッチ; 音声コントロール; その他
hu: Felhasználói vezérlés módja: Kézi távirányító; Beépített vezérlőpult; Okostelefon-alkalmazás; Okosóra; Hangvezérlés; Egyéb
vi: Phương thức điều khiển của người dùng: Điều khiển từ xa cầm tay; Bảng điều khiển tích hợp; Ứng dụng điện thoại thông minh; Đồng hồ thông minh; Điều khiển bằng giọng nói; Khác
de: Bedienungsmethode: Handfernbedienung; Integriertes Bedienfeld; Smartphone-App; Smartwatch; Sprachsteuerung; Sonstiges
bg-BG: Метод за управление от потребителя: Ръчно дистанционно управление; Вграден контролен панел; Приложение за смартфон; Смарт часовник; Гласово управление; Друг
el: Μέθοδος ελέγχου χρήστη: Τηλεχειριστήριο χειρός; Ενσωματωμένος πίνακας ελέγχου; Εφαρμογή smartphone; Smartwatch; Φωνητικός έλεγχος; Άλλο
cs: Metoda ovládání uživatelem: Ruční dálkové ovládání; Integrovaný ovládací panel; Aplikace pro smartphone; Chytré hodinky; Hlasové ovládání; Jiné
en: User control method: Handheld remote control; On-board control panel; Smartphone app; Smartwatch; Voice control; Other
ko: 사용자 제어 방식: 휴대용 리모컨; 내장형 제어 패널; 스마트폰 앱; 스마트워치; 음성 제어; 기타
zh-TW: 使用者控制方式: 手持遙控器; 內建控制面板; 智慧型手機 app; 智慧型手錶; 語音控制; 其他
sv: Metod för användarkontroll: Handhållen fjärrkontroll; Inbyggd kontrollpanel; Smartphone-app; Smartklocka; Röststyrning; Övrigt
zh-CN: 用户控制方法: 手持遥控器; 内置控制面板; 智能手机应用; 智能手表; 语音控制; 其他
da: Betjeningsmetode for bruger: Håndholdt fjernbetjening; Indbygget kontrolpanel; Smartphone-app; Smartwatch; Stemmestyring; Andet
nb: Kontrollmetode for bruker: Håndholdt fjernkontroll; Innebygd kontrollpanel; Smarttelefon-app; Smartklokke; Stemmestyring; Annet
tr: Kullanıcı kontrol yöntemi: Elde taşınır uzaktan kumanda; Dahili kontrol paneli; Akıllı telefon uygulaması; Akıllı saat; Ses kontrolü; Diğer
fr: Méthode de contrôle de l'utilisateur: Télécommande portative; Panneau de commande intégré; Appli pour smartphone; Montre intelligente; Commande vocale; Autre
es: Método de control del usuario: Control remoto portátil; Panel de control integrado; App para smartphone; Reloj inteligente; Control por voz; Otro
ro-RO: Metodă de control pentru utilizator: Telecomandă portabilă; Panou de control integrat; App pentru smartphone; Smartwatch; Control vocal; Altele
ru: Метод управления пользователем: Пульт дистанционного управления; Встроенная панель управления; Приложение для смартфона; Смарт-часы; Голосовое управление; Другое
lt-LT: Naudotojo kontrolės metodas: Nešiojamasis nuotolinio valdymo pultas; Integruotas valdymo pultas; Išmaniojo telefono programėlė; Išmanusis laikrodis; Valdymas balsu; Kita